Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 2 Administration of State Institutions

40.1-2-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Care and treatment” means the health services provided on an inpatient or outpatient basis in any facility directly operated by the department. Those services may include, but are not limited to, medical services, nursing care, bed and board, ancillary treatment services, and all other diagnostics and therapeutic items and services provided by the facility.

“Charges” means the full and customary charges for care and treatment in each facility. Charges shall be calculated and billed in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to §

40.1-2-2

.

“Department” means the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Facility” means any institutional or other treatment program operated directly by the department.

“Patient” means:

Every individual who receives care and treatment in a facility, and/or that individual’s spouse;

The patient’s legal guardian or conservator;

The executor or administrator of the patient’s estate if the patient is deceased;

Any family member, friend, or other individual who has possession or control of all or part of the patient’s estate.

“Patient’s estate” means the patient’s assets and income, whether in possession or under control of the patient, the patient’s spouse, the patient’s legal guardian or conservator, or a family member, friend, or other individual. Assets and income, and their treatment for billing purposes, shall be set forth in the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to §

40.1-2-2

.

“Third-party programs” means any insurance or welfare program, which provides reimbursement for care and treatment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 520, § 2.

40.1-2-2.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt, amend, promulgate, and enforce rules and regulations as are deemed necessary to accomplish the purposes of §§

40.1-2-1

—

40.1-2-5

; provided, however, that all rules and regulations shall be consistent with all applicable state and federal statutes and regulations governing third-party programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 520, § 2.

40.1-2-3.
Investigation of patient’s estate and eligibility for third-party programs — Billing.

The department shall investigate each patient’s estate and shall also continually monitor each patient’s eligibility for third-party programs. The department shall seek payment or contribution for the charges for each patient’s care and treatment from every third-party program for which the patient is eligible. The department shall bill the patient for any charges not covered by third-party programs in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to §

40.1-2-2

; provided, however, that the department shall not bill the patient for any charges paid by a third-party program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 520, § 2.

40.1-2-4.
Disclosure of information about patient’s estate.

Any bank or other custodian of assets or income that is part of any patient’s estate shall be required to disclose the existence, nature, and amount of the assets and income upon written request of the department. The department shall not disclose, directly or indirectly, any information so obtained, except as provided in the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to §

40.1-2-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 520, § 2.

40.1-2-5.
Duty of patient to pay charges for care and treatment — Court action for collection.

Every patient shall pay, from the patient’s estate, all charges billed to the patient for care and treatment in a facility. The department may undertake any action, including, but not limited to, court action, to reach the estate of a patient who has accrued unpaid charges for care and treatment. The department may also accept less than the full amount owed in full settlement, in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to §

40.1-2-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 520, § 2.

40.1-2-6.
Records and reports as to institution residents.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall keep a record showing the name, residence, sex, age, nativity, occupation, condition, and date of entrance or commitment of every patient or client in the several institutions under the control of the department; the date, cause, and terms of discharge, and the condition of those persons at the time of leaving; all transfers from one institution to another; and if any patient or client dies, the date and cause of death. These and such other facts as the department may, from time to time, require shall be furnished by the managing officer of each institution to the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals within twenty-four (24) hours after the commitment, entrance, death, or discharge of any patient or client. In case of an accident, injury, or death under peculiar circumstances of a patient or client, the managing officer shall make a special report within twenty-four (24) hours thereafter to the director, giving the circumstances of the injury or death as fully as possible. The record shall be accessible only to the director of the department, the officers, agents, and employees thereof, except by permission of the director or upon order of the governor or of a judge of a court of record. Whenever it is required by law that a notice, order, or other communication be made to the department, it shall be a sufficient compliance with the law if the notice, order, or other communication is made to the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 520, § 2.

40.1-2-7.
Application of funds deposited to care and treatment of residents.

The fiscal agent of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall apply any funds now or hereafter deposited in the name of any discharged or deceased patient or inmate in any institution under the control of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals as partial or full payment, as the case may be, for the care and treatment of the patient or inmate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3289, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-7

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-8.
Notice of balance to credit of deceased or discharged resident.

When a balance remains after the payment of the amount due the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals for care and treatment, the fiscal agent shall cause notice of the balance to be mailed, postage prepaid, to each discharged patient or inmate at his or her last known address or to the nearest known next of kin of the deceased patient or inmate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3289, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-8

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-9.
Payment of balance to general treasurer.

The balance as shall remain after the amount due the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals for the care and treatment of a discharged or deceased patient or inmate is applied in payment thereof shall be paid over to the general treasurer by the fiscal agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3289, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-9

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-10.
Establishment of right to balance paid to general treasurer.

Any person or persons claiming a right to any moneys paid to the general treasurer may establish that right in the same manner as is provided in the case of unclaimed bank deposits in the hands of the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3289, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-10

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-11.
Abandonment of property of deceased or discharged residents.

All personal property, excepting moneys, that shall have been left by any discharged or deceased patient or inmate in any institution under the control of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and that, now or hereafter, shall not have been claimed by any of the discharged or deceased patients or inmates, or their next of kin, within one year from the date of discharge or decease, shall be deemed to have been abandoned. All abandoned personal property shall be disposed of as provided in §

40.1-2-12

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3448, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-11

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 135.

40.1-2-12.
Transfer of abandoned property to the general treasurer.

The fiscal agent of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall order the transfer of the abandoned personal property to the general treasurer for sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3448, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-12

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1982, ch. 122, § 1.

40.1-2-13.
Description of abandoned property transferred.

The fiscal agent shall, upon ordering transfer of the abandoned personal property, cause to be forwarded to the general treasurer a list or declaration setting forth the name of each discharged or deceased patient or inmate and a description of each article of personal property abandoned as provided in §

40.1-2-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3448, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-13

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1982, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 135.

40.1-2-14.
Sale of abandoned property — Remission of proceeds.

The general treasurer, upon receipt of the abandoned personal property and the list or declaration, shall sell the articles at public sale advertised in a manner that, to the general treasurer, shall seem satisfactory and the general treasurer shall remit the proceeds received from the sale to the fiscal agent together with a list or declaration setting forth the amount of money to be credited to the account of each discharged or deceased patient or inmate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3448, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-14

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1982, ch. 122, § 1.

40.1-2-15.
Application of proceeds of sale.

The proceeds from the advertised public sale or sales, when received by the fiscal agent, shall be treated by him or her in the same manner as is provided for in §§

40.1-2-7

—

40.1-2-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3448, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-15

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-16.
Protection of health of residents.

In exercising the power and authority to provide for the care and physical welfare of the inmates, prisoners, patients, and pupils in the several institutions under its control and for the protection of the public health, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall furnish all necessary medical aid and attention, and shall take all necessary steps to promote the health of the inmates, prisoners, patients, and pupils, and especially to guard them and the general public against all dangerous, infectious, and contagious diseases at those institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1918, ch. 1613, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 4, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 54, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-16

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-17.
Resident physicians and dentists.

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall appoint resident physicians, dentists, and other physicians as may be necessary to give proper attention to the physical and mental welfare of the inmates of the institutions under the control of the department. The general assembly shall annually appropriate the sum as it may deem necessary to compensate those appointees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 11; P.L. 1920, ch. 1901, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2230, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 11; P.L. 1925, ch. 639, § 2; P.L. 1930, ch. 1508, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1888, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, §§ 50, 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-17

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-18.
Examination of inmates for contagious disease — Investigation and report of sources.

The department is hereby authorized and directed, by the attending physician at any of the institutions or by such other physician as the director of the department may, from time to time, designate, to use every available means to ascertain the existence of any dangerous, infectious, or contagious disease, including syphilis in the infectious stages and gonococcus infection, among the inmates, prisoners, patients, and pupils of those institutions, and to make examination of any of them suspected of having syphilis in the infectious stages or gonococcus infection, and immediately to investigate the source of the infection, and if ascertained, to report the same to the department of health; and any person committed to or received into any of those institutions by, through, or under any order of court or any process of law shall be deemed to be an inmate, prisoner, patient, or pupil of the institution, as the case may be, within the provisions of §§

40.1-2-16

—

40.1-2-21

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 1918, ch. 1613, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 4, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 54, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-18

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-19.
Treatment and isolation of diseased residents — Detention after time for release.

Every inmate, prisoner, patient, or pupil in any of the institutions under the department’s control, who has any dangerous, infectious, or contagious disease, including syphilis in the infectious stages and gonococcus infection, shall be forthwith placed under medical treatment, and if in the opinion of the attending physician it is necessary, shall be isolated until danger of contagion has passed, or until the attending physician determines that further isolation is unnecessary; and if danger of contagion shall not have passed, or if further isolation is still necessary at the expiration of sentence or at the time for discharge or release from the institution, the afflicted inmate, prisoner, patient, or pupil shall be detained in the institution and continued under medical treatment until the attending physician shall determine that his or her discharge or release from the institution will not endanger the public health; and during the period of detention, the person so detained shall be supported in the same manner as before the detention.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 1918, ch. 1613, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 4, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 54, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-19

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 105; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 105.

40.1-2-20.
Records of venereal disease.

For the statistical purposes of the department of health, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall keep records of all cases of venereal diseases in institutions under its control, but those records shall not be open to public inspection, and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall make every reasonable effort to keep secret the identity of those with such diseases so far as may be consistent with the enforcement of the provisions of §§

40.1-2-16

—

40.1-2-21

and with the protection of the public health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 4, § 5; P.L. 1918, ch. 1613, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 4, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 54, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 80, 180; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-20

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 105; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 105.

40.1-2-21.
Powers as to health of residents.

In carrying out the provisions of §§

40.1-2-16

—

40.1-2-20

the department is hereby vested with full powers of inspection, examination, isolation, and disinfection of all inmates, prisoners, patients, or pupils in any of those institutions, and those powers may be delegated to and exercised by any attending physician at any of the institutions or by such other physician as the director of the department may, from time to time, designate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 4, § 4; P.L. 1918, ch. 1613, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 4, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 54, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-21

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-22.
Religious instructors and services.

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall appoint religious instructors who shall conduct religious services at such times and at such places within institutions under the control of the department, and who shall perform such other duties consistent with their office, as may be required of them by the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum as it may deem necessary to compensate those religious instructors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 12; P.L. 1922, ch. 2330, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 12; P.L. 1925, ch. 639, § 3; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-22

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-23.
Tenure of officers — Duties — Time devoted to duty — Sales to state by employees — Bond.

All officers appointed by the director hereunder shall hold their respective offices during his or her pleasure, and may be removed and their successors appointed by the director at any time. In addition to the duties prescribed for those officers by law, they shall perform such other duties as the director may, from time to time, require not inconsistent with law, and those officers shall make reports and keep records as the director may, from time to time, require in addition to the records and reports that the officers may be required to keep and make by any other provision of law. Those officers, except those named in §§

40.1-2-17

and

40.1-2-22

, shall give their entire time to the duties of their respective offices, and shall not hold any other state office, except that of notary public, or any other position of pay or profit in the service of the state, and shall not furnish for pay or profit any materials, merchandise, or supplies to the state. The director may require any of those officers to give bond to the state for the faithful performance of their duties in the sum and with such surety as to the director may seem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 19; P.L. 1922, ch. 2230, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-23

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-24.
Compensation of officers and employees.

The director shall fix the compensation of the officers and employees of the several institutions appointed under the authority of this chapter, and of the other institutions under his or her control, within the sum or sums appropriated to be expended for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

40-2-24

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-25.
Institutional farms.

The director may set apart for cultivation and other farming purposes any of the land under his or her control, whether or not the land is within the limits of any institution defined as provided in this chapter, and may place that land under the care and control of the officer in charge of the institution within the limits of which the land is situated or to which the land is adjacent, or the department may employ some experienced person to take charge of the cultivation of the whole or part of the land devoted to farming purposes and of the farm stock raised thereon, provided that careful account shall be kept of the product of the farming and each institution shall be credited, as near as may be, with the value of the farm product resulting from the labor of its inmates, and shall be charged with the value of all farm product used for the maintenance of the institution. All farm products shall be disposed of as directed by the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. The director may employ assistance and hire labor as he or she may deem necessary to enable him or her to carry out the provisions of this section and may fix the compensation thereof within the sum appropriated to be expended for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 18; P.L. 1922, ch. 2230, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, § 40-2-25; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 135.

40.1-2-26.
Supervision of schools in institutions — Qualifications of teachers.

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall annually make to the council on elementary and secondary education in the month of July, a report of all the schools maintained in the institutions under its control, the report to be in manner and form as prescribed by law for other educational institutions. The council on elementary and secondary education may visit and inspect those schools and make suggestions to the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals for the improvement of them, as it may deem advisable. All teachers employed in those schools shall hold certificates of qualification as required by law of public school teachers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-2-28; P.L. 1960, ch. 73, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-27.
Departmental seal.

The department shall have a seal that shall have engraved thereon the words “Department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, state of Rhode Island,” and the seal shall be affixed to all written contracts that the department is authorized and directed to make under the provisions of this chapter, and those contracts shall be signed by the director of the department. The seal shall also be affixed to other orders and papers issued by the department as the department may by rule or order direct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, § 40-2-29; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-28.
Annual report to general assembly.

The director shall make an annual report to the general assembly during the month of January, setting forth:

The condition and needs of the several institutions under his or her control; the number of inmates in each institution; an abstract of all reports received from officers incident to the performance of their duties.

A complete financial statement of the several institutions, together with estimates of the amounts required for the ensuing year, for salaries and pay, for construction and repairs, and for all other expenses of maintenance.

Information and recommendations as to the director may seem proper for the efficient administration and development of the several institutions, and for promoting the physical, mental, and moral welfare of the inmates thereof, and for measures whereby the number of prospective inmates may be decreased and the number of past inmates kept from returning may be increased, and for any additional legislation needed for these purposes.

Such other information or recommendations as may be requested by the governor or by the general assembly.

The annual report shall be made a matter of public record.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 21; P.L. 1922, ch. 2230, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 10; G.L. 1956, § 40-2-30; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-29.
Prohibition against duplication of keys.

Every key for maximum security units of the several institutions under the control of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall contain embossed thereon the state seal with the words “do not duplicate,” and whoever reproduces or causes to be reproduced any key without a written order from the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 138, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-2-31; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40.1-2-30.
Petitions for appointment of conservator or legal guardian.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall have standing to petition the appropriate probate court for the appointment of a suitable person to serve as conservator, or to serve as legal guardian of the person or estate or both, of any patient or client served in any facility operated by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 520, § 2.